Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-143
Poor person; where chargeable.

Any person becoming chargeable as a poor person in this state shall be chargeable as such in the county in which he or she has established a legal settlement as defined in section 68-115.

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 13.